Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 52-1301 to 52-1322, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 52-1302.01 to 52-1311 shall be used.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 4, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 59.